Mississippi, session 2026, HB1604.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 9-11-31, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 9-11-31.  (1)  (a)  When any justice court judge is unable, by reason of being under any suspension by the Commission on Judicial Performance or the Mississippi Supreme Court, suspension by a circuit court judge while under indictment for a felony offense, or by reason of sickness or other disability, to attend and hold court at the time and place required by law to do so for a period of time in excess of thirty (30) consecutive days, and due to such inability to attend and hold court there is no judge to hold court in such county, the board of supervisors of the county in which such judge serves shall appoint another justice court judge of the county or an adjoining county or a municipal court judge to attend and hold said court and perform all the duties of such judge during such suspension or disability. (2)  Any presently sitting justice court judge appointed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall, for the period of his service, receive * * *no additional compensation from the county for each day of his or her service a sum equal to 1/260ths of the current salary in effect for justice court judges.  Any other person so appointed shall, for the period of his service, receive compensation from the county for each day's service a sum equal to 1/260ths of the current salary in effect for justice court judges. SECTION 2.  Section 25-3-36, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 25-3-36.  (1)  Until October 1, 2008, every justice court judge shall receive as full compensation for his or her services, and in lieu of any and all other fees, costs or compensation heretofore authorized for such justice court judge, an annual salary based upon the population of his or her county according to the latest federal decennial census; however, no justice court judge shall be paid less than the salary authorized under this section to be paid the justice court judge based upon the population of the county according to the 1980 federal decennial census.  The amount of which salary shall be determined as follows: (a)  In counties with a population of more than two hundred thousand (200,000), a salary of Fifty-five Thousand Five Hundred Fifty-nine Dollars ($55,559.00). (b)  In counties with a population of more than one hundred fifty thousand (150,000) but not more than two hundred thousand (200,000), a salary of Fifty-one Thousand Five Dollars ($51,005.00). (c)  In counties with a population of more than seventy-five thousand (75,000) but not more than one hundred fifty thousand (150,000), a salary of Forty-six Thousand Four Hundred Fifty-one Dollars ($46,451.00). (d)  In counties with a population of more than forty-nine thousand (49,000) but not more than seventy-five thousand (75,000), a salary of Forty Thousand Seventy-five Dollars ($40,075.00). (e)  In counties with a population of more than thirty-four thousand (34,000) but not more than forty-nine thousand (49,000), a salary of Thirty-four Thousand Six Hundred Ten Dollars ($34,610.00). (f)  In counties with a population of more than twenty-four thousand five hundred (24,500) but not more than thirty-four thousand (34,000), a salary of Thirty-two Thousand Seven Hundred Eighty-nine Dollars ($32,789.00). (g)  In counties with a population of more than twenty-one thousand (21,000) but not more than twenty-four thousand five hundred (24,500), a salary of Twenty-nine Thousand One Hundred Forty-six Dollars ($29,146.00). (h)  In counties with a population of more than sixteen thousand five hundred (16,500) but not more than twenty-one thousand (21,000), a salary of Twenty-five Thousand Five Hundred Two Dollars ($25,502.00). (i)  In counties with a population of more than twelve thousand (12,000) but not more than sixteen thousand five hundred (16,500), a salary of Twenty-one Thousand Eight Hundred Fifty-nine Dollars ($21,859.00). (j)  In counties with a population of more than eight thousand (8,000) but not more than twelve thousand (12,000), a salary of Eighteen Thousand Dollars ($18,000.00). (k)  In counties with a population of eight thousand (8,000) or less, a salary of Fourteen Thousand Four Hundred Dollars ($14,400.00). The board of supervisors of any county having two (2) judicial districts and two (2) justice court judges for the county shall pay each justice court judge an amount equal to that provided in this subsection for judges in the next higher population category per year, if the justice court judge maintains regular office hours and is personally present in the office they maintain for at least thirty (30) hours per week. In any county having a population greater than eight thousand (8,000) but less than eight thousand five hundred (8,500) according to the 1990 federal decennial census and in which U.S. Highway 61 and Mississippi Highway 4 intersect, the board of supervisors, in its discretion, may pay such justice court judges an additional amount not to exceed the sum of Eleven Thousand Five Hundred Fifty Dollars ($11,550.00) per year, payable beginning April 1, 1997. In any county having a population greater than ten thousand (10,000) but less than ten thousand five hundred (10,500) according to the 1990 federal decennial census and in which Mississippi Highway 3 and Mississippi Highway 6 intersect, the board of supervisors, in its discretion, may pay such justice court judges an additional amount not to exceed One Thousand Four Hundred Fifty Dollars ($1,450.00) per year, payable beginning April 1, 1997. In any county having a population greater than twenty-four thousand seven hundred (24,700) and less than twenty-four thousand nine hundred (24,900), according to the 1990 federal census, wherein Mississippi Highways 15 and 16 intersect, the board of supervisors shall pay such justice court judge an additional amount equal to Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) per year. (2)  From and after October 1, 2008, every justice court judge shall receive as full compensation for his or her services, and in lieu of any and all other fees, costs or compensation heretofore authorized for such justice court judge, an annual salary in an amount that is the greater of the following: (a)  The amount paid to a member of the board of supervisors in the same county in which the justice court judge presides; or (b)  One hundred three percent (103%) of the salary authorized under this section as of September 30, 2008, for a justice court judge in that county. If supervisors of a county receive a salary increase, justice court judges whose salary is determined under this paragraph shall be paid an amount reflecting a commensurate increase. (3)  Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, in the event that the number of justice court judges authorized pursuant to Section 9-11-2(1) is exceeded pursuant to the provisions of Section 9-11-2(4), the aggregate of the salaries paid to the justice court judges of such a county shall not exceed the amount sufficient to pay the number of justice court judges authorized pursuant to Section 9-11-2(1), and such amount shall be equally divided among those justice court judges continuing to hold office under the provisions of Section 9-11-2(4). (4)  From and after January 1, 1984, all fees, costs, fines and penalties charged and collected in the justice court shall be paid to the clerk of the justice court for deposit, along with monies from cash bonds and other monies which have been forfeited in criminal cases, into the general fund of the county as provided in Section 9-11-19; and the clerk of the board of supervisors shall be authorized and empowered, upon approval by the board of supervisors, to make disbursements and withdrawals from the general fund of the county in order to pay any reasonable and necessary expenses incurred in complying with this section, including payment of the salaries of justice court judges as provided by subsection (1) of this section.  The provisions of this subsection shall not, except as to cash bonds and other monies which have been forfeited in criminal cases, apply to monies required to be deposited in the justice court clerk clearing account as provided in Section 9-11-18, Mississippi Code of 1972. (5)  The salaries provided for in this section shall be payable monthly by warrant drawn by the clerk of the board of supervisors on the general fund of the county; however, the board of supervisors, by resolution duly adopted and entered on its minutes, may provide that such salaries shall be paid semimonthly on the first and fifteenth day of each month or every two (2) weeks pursuant to Section 25-3-29.  If a pay date falls on a weekend or legal holiday, salary payments shall be made on the workday immediately preceding the weekend or legal holiday. (6)  Provided, that the salary of any justice court judge shall not be reduced during his term of office as a result of a population change following a federal decennial census. (7)  Any justice court judge who is unable to attend and hold court by reason of being under suspension by the Commission on Judicial Performance or the Mississippi Supreme Court, or suspension by a Circuit Court judge while under indictment for a felony offense, shall not receive a salary while under such suspension. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.